Washington statutes.
RCW 43.119.005

Legislative declaration.

The legislature finds that it is important to achieve equal opportunity for all of its citizens. The legislature finds that women face unique problems and needs. For economic, social, and historical reasons, a disproportionate number of women find themselves disadvantaged or isolated from the benefits of equal opportunity. It is the purpose of this chapter to improve the well-being of women, by enabling them to participate fully in all fields of endeavor, assisting them in obtaining governmental services, and promoting equal compensation and fairness in employment for women. The legislature also believes that addressing women's issues and improving the well-being of women will have a positive impact on larger societal issues. The legislature further finds that the development of public policy and the efficient delivery of governmental services to meet the needs of women can be improved by establishing a focal point in state government for the interests of women. Therefore, the legislature deems it necessary to establish in statute the Washington state women's commission to further these purposes. The commission shall address issues relevant to the problems and needs of women, such as domestic violence, child care, child support, sexual discrimination, sexual harassment, equal compensation and job pathways opportunities in employment, and the specific needs of women of color.

[ 2018 c 98 s 1.]